Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.175

Superintendent of public instruction—Powers and duties.

The superintendent of public instruction shall:

(1) Aid regional committees in the performance of their duties by furnishing them with plans of procedure, standards, data, maps, forms, and other necessary materials and services essential to a study and understanding of the problems of school district organization in their respective educational service districts; and

(2) Carry out powers and duties of the superintendent of public instruction relating to the organization and reorganization of school districts.

[ 2006 c 263 s 501; 1999 c 315 s 302.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.